California statutes. Education Code
 appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49421.5.

(a) (1) On or before June 30, 2022, the State Department of Education shall establish a process to select, with approval from the executive director of the state board, a local educational agency to provide guidance around Medi-Cal billing and increase local educational agencies’ capacity to successfully submit claims through the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program. The local educational agency selected shall have demonstrated success in submitting claims through the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program and drawing down federal reimbursement for Medi-Cal services, and a willingness and capacity to perform the duties described in paragraph (2). The State Department of Health Care Services shall provide relevant data, including, but not limited to, the number of years
 participating in the program and cost reimbursement data for each local educational agency, in the form and manner requested by the State Department of Education and the executive director of the state board no later than August 31, 2021, to aid in the selection process. The State Department of Health Care Services shall assist the State Department of Education, as needed, with the selection process, including verifying information provided by local educational agencies regarding program participation during the selection process.

(2) The local educational agency selected pursuant to paragraph (1) shall do all of the following:

(A) Provide effective assistance and support to local educational agencies in securing federal reimbursement for services provided to Medi-Cal eligible pupils.

(B) Work in coordination and
 collaboration with expert lead agencies identified pursuant to Section 52073.1, special education resource leads identified pursuant to Section 52073.2, the State Department of Education, and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(C) Identify and disseminate information regarding existing resources, professional development activities, and other efforts currently available to assist local educational agencies in successfully submitting claims through the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program and drawing down federal reimbursement for Medi-Cal services.

(D) Upon request by the State Department of Education and the State Department of Health Care Services, develop new resources and activities designed to build capacity for local educational agencies to secure federal reimbursement for services provided to Medi-Cal eligible pupils.

(E) Serve as a point of contact for local educational agencies, and regularly participate and share the perspectives of local educational agencies in the Local Educational Agency Program Advisory Workgroup convened by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(F) Other duties, as prescribed by the State Department of Education, to enhance Medi-Cal services on schoolsites, increase access of care for pupils, and increase Medi-Cal reimbursement for local educational agencies.

(3) A local educational agency may partner as a consortium with other local educational agencies, institutions of higher education, nonprofit educational services providers, county mental health providers, or other local partners to submit a proposal to the State Department of Education to be considered for selection as the local educational
 agency pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) (1) The term of a local educational agency selected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not exceed five years.

(2) The selected local educational agency shall commit to providing program data to the State Department of Education, as specified by the Superintendent, to evaluate the effectiveness of the activities performed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(3) At the conclusion of the term of the selected local educational agency, the State Department of Education, with approval from the executive director of the state board, may renew the term of the selected local educational agency or select a new local educational agency in a manner consistent with subdivision (a).

(4) If a selected
 local educational agency requests that its term be renewed, it shall provide a description of the efforts it has made to carry out the duties described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and before renewing the term, the State Department of Education shall evaluate the local educational agency’s success in carrying out those duties.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year, each fiscal year the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of Education to be awarded to the local educational agency selected pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (c) shall be deemed to be “General Fund
 revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the appropriation made by subdivision (c) for the 2021–22 fiscal year shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2022–23 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the
 2022–23 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 56.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Employment of Medical Personnel [49422. - 49429.5.]

49422.

(a) No physician, psychiatrist, oculist, dentist, dental hygienist, optometrist, otologist, podiatrist, audiologist, or nurse not employed in that capacity by the State Department of Health Services, shall be, nor shall any other person be, employed or permitted to supervise the health and physical development of pupils unless he or she holds a services credential with a specialization in health or a valid credential issued prior to the operative date of Section 25 of Chapter 557 of the Statutes of 1990.

(b) Any psychologist employed pursuant to Section 49400 and this article shall hold a school psychologist credential, a general pupil personnel services credential authorizing service as a school psychologist, a standard designated services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services authorizing service as a psychologist, or a services credential issued by the State Board of Education or Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(c) The services credential with a specialization in health authorizing service as a school nurse shall not authorize teaching services unless the holder also completes the requirements for a special class authorization in health in a program that is approved by the commission.

(d) No physician employed by a district to perform medical services pursuant to Section 44873, who meets the requirements of that section, shall be required to hold a credential issued by the State Board of Education or commission.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section 2910 of the Business and Professions Code, no person who is an employee of a school district shall administer psychological tests or engage in other psychological activities involving the application of psychological principles, methods, or procedures unless at least one of the following applies:

(A) The person holds a valid and current credential as a school psychologist issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing that permits the holder to administer psychological testing to, or engage in psychological activities with, pupils.

(B) Psychological assistants or school psychology interns perform the testing or activities under the supervision of a person who holds a credential described in subparagraph (A).

(C) This section does not preclude appropriately credentialed school personnel including, but not limited to, holders of a pupil personnel services credential, health services credential, or special education personnel, from performing the duties consistent with the training standards established by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing for the credential held.

(2) The application of these principles and methods includes, but is not restricted to, procedures on interviewing, psychoeducational assessment, diagnosis of specific learning and behavioral disabilities, and amelioration of learning and behavioral problems of individuals or groups.

(3) The person conducting a test or other assessment shall be qualified in accordance with the requirements established by the producer of the assessment instrument and shall follow all ethical requirements for the use of the test or assessment as prescribed by the appropriate professional organization.

(f) This section shall not be construed to affect any lawfully contracted mental health professional licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code from performing services within the scope of his or her employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 661, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

49423.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 49422, any pupil who is required to take, during the regular schoolday, medication prescribed for the pupil by a physician and surgeon or ordered for the pupil by a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, may be assisted by the school nurse or other designated school personnel, or may carry and self-administer a prescription epinephrine delivery system, if the local educational agency receives the appropriate written statements identified in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) In order for a pupil to be assisted by a school nurse or other
 designated school personnel pursuant to subdivision (a), the local educational agency shall obtain both a written statement from the physician and surgeon or physician assistant detailing the name of the medication, method, amount, and time schedules by which the medication is to be taken and a written statement from the parent, foster parent, or guardian of the pupil indicating the desire that the local educational agency assist the pupil in the matters set forth in the statement of the physician and surgeon or physician assistant.

(2) In order for a pupil to carry and self-administer a prescription
 epinephrine delivery system pursuant to subdivision (a), the local educational agency shall obtain both a written statement from the physician and surgeon or physician assistant detailing the name of the medication, method, amount, and time schedules by which the medication is to be taken, and confirming that the pupil is able to self-administer the epinephrine delivery system, and a written statement from the parent, foster parent, or guardian of the pupil consenting to the self-administration, providing a release for the school nurse or other designated school personnel to consult with the health care provider of the pupil regarding any questions that may arise with regard to the medication, and releasing the local educational agency and school personnel from civil liability if the self-administering pupil suffers an adverse reaction as a result of self-administering medication pursuant
 to this paragraph.

(3) The written statements specified in this subdivision shall be provided at least annually and more frequently if the medication, dosage, frequency of administration, or reason for administration changes.

(c) A pupil may be subject to disciplinary action pursuant to Section 48900 if that pupil uses an epinephrine delivery system in a manner other than as prescribed.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 322, Sec. 3.   (SB 568)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49423.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 49422, a pupil who is required to take, during the regular schoolday, medication prescribed for the pupil by a physician or surgeon, may be assisted by the school nurse or other designated school personnel or may carry and self-administer inhaled asthma medication if the school district receives the appropriate written statements specified in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) In order for a pupil to be assisted by a school nurse or other designated school personnel pursuant to subdivision (a), the school district shall obtain both a written statement from the physician or surgeon detailing the name of the
 medication, method, amount, and time schedules by which the medication is to be taken and a written statement from the parent, foster parent, or guardian of the pupil requesting that the school district assist the pupil in the matters set forth in the statement of the physician or surgeon.

(2) (A) In order for a pupil to carry and self-administer prescription inhaled asthma medication pursuant to subdivision (a), the school district shall obtain both a written statement from the physician or surgeon detailing the name of the medication, method, amount, and time schedules by which the medication is to be taken, and confirming that the pupil is able to self-administer inhaled asthma medication, and a written statement from the parent, foster parent, or guardian of the pupil consenting to the self-administration,
 providing a release for the school nurse or other designated school personnel to consult with the health care provider of the pupil regarding any questions that may arise with regard to the medication, and releasing the school district and school personnel from civil liability if the self-administering pupil suffers an adverse reaction by taking medication pursuant to this section.

(B) (i) A school district shall accept the written statement from a physician or surgeon, as specified in this paragraph, from a physician or surgeon who is contracted with a health plan licensed pursuant to Section 1351.2 of the Health and Safety Code.
 A written statement specified in this subparagraph shall be provided in both English and Spanish, and shall include the name and contact information for the physician or surgeon.

(ii) A school nurse or other school personnel shall not be subject to professional review, be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution for their acts or omissions relating to a pupil self-administering inhaled asthma medication in accordance with this subparagraph. A school district shall not be subject to civil liability if a pupil self-administering inhaled asthma medication in accordance with this subparagraph suffers an adverse reaction.

(3) The written statements specified in this subdivision shall be provided at
 least annually and more frequently if the medication, dosage, frequency of administration, or reason for administration changes.

(c) A pupil may be subject to disciplinary action pursuant to Section 48900 if the pupil uses inhaled asthma medication in a manner other than as prescribed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 101, Sec. 2.   (AB 743)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

49423.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 49422, an individual with exceptional needs who requires specialized physical health care services, during the regular schoolday, may be assisted by any of the following individuals:

(1) Qualified persons who possess an appropriate credential issued pursuant to Section 44267 or 44267.5, or hold a valid certificate of public health nursing issued by the Board of Registered Nursing.

(2) Qualified designated school personnel trained in the administration of specialized physical health care if they perform those services under the supervision, as defined by Section 3051.12 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, of a credentialed school nurse, public health
 nurse, or licensed physician and surgeon and the services are determined by the credentialed school nurse or licensed physician and surgeon, in consultation with the physician treating the pupil, to be all of the following:

(A) Routine for the pupil.

(B) Pose little potential harm for the pupil.

(C) Performed with predictable outcomes, as defined in the individualized education program of the pupil.

(D) Do not require a nursing assessment, interpretation, or decisionmaking by the designated school personnel.

(3) For basic respiratory services authorized by subdivision (l) of Section 3765 of the Business and
 Professions Code, a vocational nurse licensed by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California under the supervision of a credentialed school nurse.

(b) Specialized health care or other services that require medically related training shall be provided pursuant to the procedures prescribed by Section 49423.

(c) Persons providing specialized physical health care services shall also demonstrate competence in basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation and shall be knowledgeable of the emergency medical resources available in the community in which the services are performed.

(d) “Specialized physical health care services,” as used in this section, includes catheterization, gastric tube feeding, suctioning, or other services that require medically related
 training.

(e) Regulations necessary to implement this section shall be developed jointly by the State Department of Education and the State Department of Health Care Services, and adopted by the state board.

(f) This section does not diminish or weaken any federal requirement for serving individuals with exceptional needs under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and its implementing regulations, and under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) and its implementing regulations.

(g) This section does not affect current state law or regulation regarding medication administration.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section not cause individuals with exceptional needs to
 be placed at schoolsites other than those they would attend but for their needs for specialized physical health care services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 582, Sec. 2.   (SB 389)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49423.5.1.

On or before June 15, 2001, the State Department of Education shall review and make recommendations to the State Board of Education regarding any needed updates to the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 49423.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

49423.6.

(a) On or before June 15, 2001, the State Department of Education shall develop and recommend to the State Board of Education, and the board shall adopt regulations, regarding the administration of medication in the public schools pursuant to Section 49423. These regulations shall be developed in consultation with parents, representatives of the medical and nursing professions, and other individuals jointly designated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Advisory Commission on Special Education established pursuant to Section 33590, and the Department of Health Services. The Board of Registered Nursing may designate a liaison to consult with the Board of Education in the adoption of these regulations.

(b) Any regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be limited to addressing a situation where a pupil’s parent or legal guardian has initiated a request to have a local educational agency dispense medicine to a pupil, based on the written consent of the pupil’s parent or legal guardian, for a specified medicine with a specified dosage, for a specified period of time, as prescribed by a physician or other authorized medical personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 281, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

49424.

A school psychologist is a credentialed professional whose primary objective is the application of scientific principles of learning and behavior to ameliorate school-related problems and to facilitate the learning and development of children in the public schools of California.

To accomplish this objective the school psychologist provides services to children, teachers, parents, community agencies, and the school system itself. These services include:

(a) Consultation with school administrators concerning appropriate learning objectives for children, planning of developmental and remedial programs for pupils in regular and special school programs, and the development of educational experimentation and evaluation.

(b) Consultation with teachers in the development and implementation of classroom methods and procedures designed to facilitate pupil learning and to overcome learning and behavior disorders.

(c) Consultation with parents to assist in understanding the learning and adjustment processes of children.

(d) Consultation with community agencies, such as probation departments, mental health clinics, and welfare departments, concerning pupils who are being served by such community agencies.

(e) Consultation and supervision of pupil personnel services workers.

(f) Psychoeducational assessment and diagnosis of specific learning and behavioral disabilities, including, but not limited to, case study evaluation, recommendations for remediation or placement, and periodic reevaluation of such children.

(g) Psychological counseling of and other therapeutic techniques with children and parents, including parent education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49425.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 49422, a licensed physician need not hold a credential if his sole service for a school district or county superintendent of schools is service as a member of a committee whose function is to consider written and oral information and reports concerning the pupil that are available to the committee and, upon the basis of such information and reports, to recommend the admission of the pupil to, or his discharge from, special schools and classes for exceptional children.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49426.

A school nurse is a registered nurse currently licensed under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, and who has completed the additional educational requirements for, and possesses a current credential in, school nursing pursuant to Section 44877.

School nurses strengthen and facilitate the educational process by improving and protecting the health status of children and by identification and assistance in the removal or modification of health-related barriers to learning in individual children. The major focus of school health services is the prevention of illness and disability, and the early detection and correction of health problems. The school nurse is especially prepared and uniquely qualified in preventive health, health assessment, and referral procedures.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the scope of professional practice or otherwise to change the legal scope of practice for any registered nurse or other licensed healing arts practitioner. Rather, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide positively for the health services, many of which may be performed in the public schools only by physicians and school nurses. School nurses may perform, if authorized by the local governing board, the following services:

(a) Conduct immunization programs pursuant to Section 49403 and assure that every pupil’s immunization status is in compliance with the law, including parental or guardian consent, and good health practice.

(b) Assess and evaluate the health and developmental status of pupils to identify specific physical disorders and other factors relating to the learning process, communicate with the primary care provider, and contribute significant information in order to modify the pupils’ educational plans.

(c) Interpret the health and developmental assessment to parents, teachers, administrators, and other professionals directly concerned with the pupil.

(d) Design and implement a health maintenance plan to meet the individual health needs of the students, incorporating plans directed by a physician.

(e) Refer the pupil and his or her parent or guardian to appropriate community resources for necessary services.

(f) Maintain communication with parents and all involved community practitioners and agencies to promote needed treatment and secure reports of findings pertinent to educational planning.

(g) Interpret medical and nursing findings appropriate to the student’s individual educational plan and make recommendations to professional personnel directly involved.

(h) Consult with, conduct in-service training to, and serve as a resource person to teachers and administrators, and act as a participant in implementing any section or sections of a comprehensive health instruction curriculum for students by providing current scientific information regarding nutrition, preventive dentistry, mental health, genetics, prevention of communicable diseases, self-health care, consumer education, and other areas of health.

(i) Counsel pupils and parents by:

(1) Assisting children and youth, parents, and school personnel in identifying and utilizing appropriate and mutually acceptable private and community health delivery services for professional care and remediation of defects.

(2) Counseling with parents, pupils and school staff regarding health-related attendance problems.

(3) Helping parents, school personnel and pupils understand and adjust to physical, mental and social limitations.

(4) Exploring with families and pupils, attitudes, information and values which affect their health behavior.

(j) Assist parents and pupils to solve financial, transportation and other barriers to needed health services.

The holder of a services credential with a specialization in health for a school nurse who also completes the requirements for a special class authorization in health in a program that is approved by the commission is authorized to teach classes on health in a preschool, kindergarten, grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and classes organized primarily for adults.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 172, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

49426.5.

(a) A licensed vocational nurse hired pursuant to this section shall be supervised by a credentialed school nurse who is employed as a school nurse at the same local educational agency or at another local educational agency.

(b) (1) If a local educational agency elects to hire a licensed vocational nurse to be supervised by a credentialed school nurse employed by another local educational agency, both local educational agencies shall enter into a written agreement containing all of the following:

(A) The duties of the credentialed school nurse and the licensed vocational nurse.

(B) A
 communication policy delineating how the licensed vocational nurse and the credentialed school nurse are to communicate.

(C) The indemnification requirement pursuant to subdivision (h).

(D) The financial arrangement between the local educational agencies.

(E) The additional compensation for the credentialed school nurse to act as a supervisor.

(2) A local educational agency is only authorized to hire a licensed vocational nurse pursuant to this subdivision if a written agreement with another local educational agency is in place.

(c) (1) A local educational agency shall only hire a licensed vocational nurse pursuant to this section if a diligent search has been
 conducted for a suitable credentialed school nurse each school year. A diligent search shall include, but is not limited to, distributing job announcements, contacting college and university placement centers, and advertising in print or electronic media. Copies of all recruitment efforts and the salary or salary range advertised as part of the recruitment efforts shall be retained by the employing agency.

(2) A local educational agency shall seek approval from its governing board or body before hiring a licensed vocational nurse pursuant to this section, including by submitting a declaration to its governing board or body containing all of the following:

(A) That the local educational agency made a diligent effort to recruit a credentialed school nurse with the proper qualifications for the opening.

(B) That the
 effort to recruit a credentialed school nurse was not successful.

(C) That hiring a licensed vocational nurse is necessary to fulfill a critical need.

(3) A local educational agency electing to hire a licensed vocational nurse pursuant to this section shall certify to the department, upon penalty of perjury, that a diligent recruitment effort to hire a credentialed school nurse was made.

(d) Subdivision (a) shall not be interpreted to allow a licensed vocational nurse to go beyond the approved scope of practice pursuant to the Vocational Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code).

(e) A licensed vocational nurse hired pursuant to this section shall only operate under the
 supervision of a credentialed school nurse based on levels of supervision described in Section 3051.12 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) County offices of education are encouraged to establish networks of credentialed school nurses for employment by local educational agencies that are not able to hire a credentialed school nurse. County offices of education are encouraged to provide mentoring opportunities for licensed vocational nurses.

(g) A local educational agency employing a credentialed school nurse who is supervising a licensed vocational nurse at another local educational agency pursuant to this section shall have indemnification for the supervisorial liability from the local educational agency employing the licensed vocational nurse.

(h) A credentialed school nurse who is supervising a
 licensed vocational nurse at another local educational agency pursuant to this section shall have indemnification for the supervisorial liability from the local educational agency employing the licensed vocational nurse.

(i) If a local educational agency uses its authority pursuant to this section, the local educational agency shall report its use of that authority to the department.

(j) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature containing a list of the local educational agencies that have used their authority pursuant to this section.

(2) The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(k) As used in this
 section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Credentialed school nurse” means only qualified persons who possess an appropriate credential issued pursuant to Section 44267.5.

(2) “Licensed vocational nurse” means a person licensed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 853, Sec. 1.   (AB 1722)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

49427.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the governing board of each school district and each county superintendent of schools maintain fundamental school health services at a level that is adequate to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Preserve pupils’ ability to learn.

(2) Fulfill existing state requirements and policies regarding pupils’ health.

(3) Contain health care costs through preventive programs and education.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the provision of these services may be in jeopardy due to the current caseloads in the public schools, and that failure to maintain adequate health services and standards will result in pupils’ poorer health and ability to learn.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

49428.

(a) A school of a school district or county office of education and a charter school shall notify pupils and parents or guardians of pupils no less than twice during the school year on how to initiate access to available pupil mental health services on campus or in the community, or both, as follows:

(1) A school shall use at least two of the following methods to notify parents or guardians:

(A) Distributing the information in a letter electronically or in
 hardcopy, including, but not limited to, through the postal service.

(B) Including the information in the parent handbook at the beginning of the school year in accordance with Section 48980.

(C) Posting the information on the school’s Internet Web site or social media Internet Web page.

(2) A school shall use at least two of the following methods to notify pupils:

(A) Distributing the information in a document or school publication electronically or in hardcopy.

(B) Including the information in pupil orientation materials at the beginning of the school year or in a pupil handbook.

(C) Posting the information on the school’s Internet Web site or social media Internet Web page.

(b) (1) A county may use funds from the Mental Health Services Act, enacted by the voters at the November 2, 2004, statewide general election as Proposition 63, to provide a grant to a school district or county office of education, or to a charter school, within the county, for purposes of funding the activities required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) A school district or county office of education, or a charter school, may apply to its respective county for a grant pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (AB 2022)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49428.1.

(a) On or before June 1, 2025, the department shall develop model referral protocols for addressing pupil behavioral health concerns. In developing these protocols, the department shall consult with the State Department of Health Care Services, the members of the Student Mental Health Policy Workgroup, local educational agencies that have served as state or regional leaders in state or federal pupil behavioral health initiatives, county behavioral health programs, current classroom teachers and administrators, current schoolsite classified staff, current schoolsite staff who hold pupil personnel services credentials, current school nurses, current school counselors, and other professionals involved in pupil behavioral health as the department deems appropriate. The department shall also select at least one member of each of the
 following groups to consult with in developing the protocols:

(1) Current high school pupils.

(2) Parents of current high school or middle school pupils.

(3) Parents of current elementary school pupils.

(b) These protocols shall be designed for use, on a voluntary basis, by schoolsites, school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, the California School for the Deaf, and the California School for the Blind, and by teacher, administrator, school counselor, pupil personnel services, and school nurse preparation programs operated by postsecondary educational institutions. The protocols shall do all of the following:

(1) Address the appropriate and timely referral by school
 staff of pupils with behavioral health concerns.

(2) Reflect a multitiered system of support process and positive behavioral interventions and supports. These protocols are encouraged to be used in lieu of disciplinary actions, and pupils who may be the subject of disciplinary action should be able to access these protocols and should not be prohibited from accessing them.

(3) Be adaptable to varied local service arrangements for behavioral health services.

(4) (A) Reflect evidence-based and culturally appropriate approaches to pupil behavioral health referral without disciplinary actions.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “evidence-based” means peer-reviewed, scientific research evidence, including studies based on research
 methodologies that control threats to both the internal and the external validity of the research findings.

(5) Address the inclusion of parents and guardians in the referral process.

(6) Be written to ensure clarity and ease of use by certificated and classified school employees.

(7) Reflect differentiated referral processes for pupils with disabilities and other populations for whom the referral process may be distinct.

(8) Be written to ensure that school employees act only within the authorization or scope of their credential or license. This section shall not be construed as authorizing or encouraging school employees to diagnose or treat youth behavioral health disorders unless they are specifically licensed and employed to do so.

(9) Be consistent with state activities conducted by the department in the administration of federally funded behavioral health programs.

(c) The department shall consider, when developing protocols under this section, the school behavioral health referral pathways toolkit developed by the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(d) The department shall post the model referral protocols on its internet website so that they may be accessed and used by educational institutions specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 56.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49428.15.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Evidence-based” means peer-reviewed, scientific research evidence, including studies based on research methodologies that control threats to both the internal and the external validity of the research findings.

(2) “Evidence-informed” means using research that is already available and has been tested for efficacy and effectiveness. This evidence is then combined with the experiences and expertise of the training program developers to best fit the population intended to be served.
